District of Columbia statutes.
5-410

Restrictions on leaving District; or being absent from duty.

No member of the Fire Department of the District of Columbia shall, unless on leave of absence, go beyond the confines of the District of Columbia, or be absent from duty without permission.

History

July 25, 1956, 70 Stat. 647, ch. 726, § 2
Aug. 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 88-471, § 6(f)
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 1201(b), 51 DCR 9406

Cross References

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-310.
1973 Ed., § 4-409a.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-194 deleted the second sentence which had read: “Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of officers and members of the Fire Department to reside anywhere within the Washington, District of Columbia, Metropolitan District.”